Louisiana, session 2026, SB400.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Civil Code Arts. 189 and 198 are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
Art. 189. Time limit for disavowal by the husband
The action for disavowal of paternity is subject to a liberative prescription of
one year twelve years. This prescription commences to run from the day of the birth
of the child, or the day the husband knew or should have known that he may not be
the biological father of the child, whichever occurs later, but shall not extend
beyond when the child attains twelve years of age.
Nevertheless, if the husband lived separate and apart from the mother
continuously during the three hundred days immediately preceding the birth of the
child, this prescription does not commence to run until the husband is notified in
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-565 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 400
writing that a party in interest has asserted that the husband is the father of the child.
* * *
Art. 198. Father's action to establish paternity; time period
A man may institute an action to establish his paternity of a child at any time
except as provided in this Article. The action is strictly personal.
If the child is presumed to be the child of another man, the action shall be
instituted within one year twelve years from the day of the birth of the child.
Nevertheless, if the mother in bad faith deceived the father of the child regarding his
paternity, the action shall be instituted within one year from the day the father knew
or should have known of his paternity, or within ten twelve years from the day of the
birth of the child, whichever first occurs.
In all cases, the action shall be instituted no later than one year from the day
of the death of the child.
The time periods in this Article are peremptive.